New York, session 2025-2026, S2376.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1678-b to read as follows: 3 § 1678-b. Fulfillment of authority commitments. Notwithstanding any 4 provision of law to the contrary, the authority shall fulfill all 5 outstanding monetary commitments made to any local government for a 6 fiscal year prior to allocating any moneys to economic development grant 7 programs for the following fiscal year. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05612-01-5